Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.213, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. General duties. (a) The state registrar shall maintain a statewide system of vital records. The state registrar is responsible for the administration and enforcement of sections 144.211 to 144.227 and shall supervise the enforcement of sections 144.211 to 144.227 and the rules promulgated thereunder. Local issuance offices that fail to comply with the statutes or rules or to properly train employees may have their issuance privileges and access to the vital records system revoked. (b) To preserve vital records, the state registrar is authorized to prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of original records and files in the Office of Vital Records. The reproductions, when certified by the state registrar, shall be accepted as the original records. (c) The state registrar shall also: (1) establish, designate, and eliminate offices in the state to aid in the efficient issuance of vital records; (2) direct the activities of all persons engaged in activities pertaining to the operation of the system of vital records; (3) develop and conduct training programs to promote uniformity of policy and procedures throughout the state in matters pertaining to the system of vital records; and (4) prescribe, furnish, and distribute all forms required by sections 144.211 to 144.227 and any rules adopted under these sections, and prescribe other means for the transmission of data, including electronic submission, that will accomplish the purpose of complete, accurate, and timely reporting deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end registrationnew text begin , and issuancenew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.225, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Access to records for research purposes. The state registrar may permit persons performing deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end research access to the information restricted in subdivision 2 or 2a if those persons agree in writing not to disclose private or confidential data on individuals. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.225, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Certified birth or death record. (a) The state registrar or local issuance office shall issue a certified birth or death record or a statement of no vital record found to an individual upon the individual's proper completion of an attestation provided by the commissioner and payment of the required fee: (1) to a person who is: (i) the subject of the vital record; (ii) a child of the subject; (iii) the spouse of the subject; (iv) a parent of the subject; (v) the grandparent or grandchild of the subject; (vi) if the requested record is a death record, a sibling of the subject; (vii) the legal custodian, guardian or conservator, or health care agent of the subject; (viii) a personal representative, by sworn affidavit of the fact that the certified copy is required for administration of the estate; (ix) a successor of the subject, as defined in section 524.1-201, if the subject is deceased, by sworn affidavit of the fact that the certified copy is required for administration of the estate; (x) if the requested record is a death record, a trustee of a trust by sworn affidavit of the fact that the certified copy is needed for the proper administration of the trust; (xi) a person or entity who demonstrates that a certified vital record is necessary for the determination or protection of a personal or property right, pursuant to rules adopted by the commissioner; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (xii) an adoption agency in order to complete confidential postadoption searches as required by section 259.83;new text begin ornew text end new text begin (xiii) a person who is eligible under section 197.63; new text end (2) to any local, state, tribal, or federal governmental agency upon request if the certified vital record is necessary for the governmental agency to perform its authorized duties; (3) to an attorney representing the subject of the vital record or another person listed in clause (1), upon evidence of the attorney's license; (4) pursuant to a court order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction. For purposes of this section, a subpoena does not constitute a court order; or (5) to a representative authorized by a person under clauses (1) to (4). (b) The state registrar or local issuance office shall also issue a certified death record to an individual described in paragraph (a), clause (1), items (ii) to (xi), if, on behalf of the individual, a licensed mortician furnishes the registrar with a properly completed attestation in the form provided by the commissioner within 180 days of the time of death of the subject of the death record. This paragraph is not subject to the requirements specified in Minnesota Rules, part 4601.2600, subpart 5, item B. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.63, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance without charge. A certified copy of a birthdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end deathdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin record pursuant to section 144.225, subdivisions 2 and 7;new text end marriage, divorce, dissolution of marriage recorddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or certified copy of veteran's discharge recorded pursuant to section 386.20deleted text begin ,deleted text end shall be issued promptly by the officer charged with the keeping of the records upon the request of, and without any charge to, any veteran, the surviving spouse or next of kin of the veteran, a county veteran service officer appointed pursuant to section 197.60, or a service officer of any veterans organization chartered by the Congress of the United States or the Department of Veterans Affairs for use in the presentation of claims to the United States Veterans Administration or in connection with any veterans organization or the Department of Veterans Affairs. The word "veteran" as used in this section means any man or woman who is a veteran as defined in section 197.447, and who is a citizen of the United States or resident alien.